Oklahoma, session 2026, SB430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-5-131 of Title 27A, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. The intentional injection, release, or dispersion, by any

means, of chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus

within the borders of this state into the atmosphere with express

purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the intensity of

sunlight is prohibited.





Req. No. 350 Page 1

B. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be

guilty of a misdemeanor in the first degree and shall be punished by

a fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

SECTION 2. REPEALER 82 O.S. 2021, Sections 1087.1,

1087.2, 1087.3, 1087.4, 1087.5, 1087.6, 1087.7, 1087.8, 1087.9,

1087.10, 1087.11, 1087.12, 1087.13, 1087.14, 1087.15, 1087.16,

1087.17, 1087.18, 1087.19, 1087.20, 1801.1, 1801.2, and 1801.4, are

hereby repealed.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-350 RD 1/14/2025 3:51:21 PM



























Req. No. 350 Page 2